District of Columbia statutes.
37-131.08

Penalties.

The Mayor may establish civil penalties for the violation of this chapter and rules promulgated pursuant to this chapter, including the establishment of civil penalties pursuant to Chapter 18 of Title 2 [§ 2-1801.01 et seq.].

History

Oct. 22, 2009, D.C. Law 18-71, § 9, 56 DCR 6619

Temporary Legislation

For temporary (225 days) amendment of this section, see § 2 of the Vending Regulations Temporary Amendment Act of 2014 (D.C. Law 20-103, May 15, 2014, 61 DCR 2433).
For temporary (225 days) amendment of this section, see § 2 of the Vending Regulations Temporary Amendment Act of 2014 (D.C. Law 20-131, Aug. 8, 2014, 61 DCR 6336.).
For temporary (225 days) amendment of this section, see § 2 of the Vending Regulations Temporary Amendment Act of 2015 (D.C. Law 21-8, June 4, 2015, 62 DCR 4566).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 10(a) of Vending Regulation Emergency Act of 2008 (D.C. Act 17-322, March 19, 2008, 55 DCR 3445).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 10(a) of Vending Regulation Emergency Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-9, January 29, 2009, 56 DCR 1638).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 10(a) of Vending Regulation Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-47, April 27, 2009, 56 DCR 3574).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 2 of the Vending Regulations Emergency Amendment Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-278, February 20, 2014, 61 DCR 1587).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 2 of the Vending Regulations Emergency Amendment Act of 2014, (D.C. Act 20-343, May 28, 2014, 61 DCR 5709).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 2 of the Classroom Animal for Educational Purposes Clarification Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-30, Mar. 27, 2015, 62 DCR 4534, 21 DCSTAT 867).